Hawaii statutes.
§287-42 Self-insurers. (a) Any person
in whose name more than twenty-five motor vehicles are registered may qualify
as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the
administrator as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b) The administrator may, in the
administrator's discretion, upon the application of such a person, issue a
certificate of self-insurance when the administrator is satisfied that the
person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay
judgments obtained against such person.

(c) Upon not less than five days' notice and a
hearing pursuant to the notice, the administrator may upon reasonable grounds
cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within
thirty days after the judgment has become final shall constitute a reasonable
ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance. [L 1949, c 393,
pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-120; HRS §287-42; am L 1980, c 84, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next